Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-601
Rules, how cited.

Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 122;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 291, § 14;

Laws 1992, LB 872, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,122;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 97;

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1104, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 91, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 585, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 42;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 448;

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 14;

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB736, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB92, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 35;

Laws 2010, LB945, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB164, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 32;

Laws 2011, LB675, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 43;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 18;

Laws 2014, LB1039, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 27;

Laws 2015, LB641, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 20;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 93;

Laws 2018, LB1009, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB81, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 16;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 35;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 23;

Laws 2025, LB561, § 1.

Sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 do not apply to the users of a hospital drive that does not fit the statutory definition of a "highway" found in section 39-602. However, common law rules applicable to users of public ways do apply. Bassinger v. Agnew, 206 Neb. 1, 290 N.W.2d 793 (1980) (pursuant to Laws 1993, LB 370, sections 97 to 470, language from sections 39-601 to 39-6,122 was placed in sections 60-601 to 60-6,374. Pursuant to Laws 1993, LB 370, section 120, "highway" is now defined in section 60-624).